Florida, session 2026, HB675.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
22
23 Section 1. Subsection (4) and paragraph (a) of subsection
24 (7) of section 125.01055, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
25 125.01055 Affordable housing.—
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb675-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 675 2026
26 (4) In exchange for a developer fulfilling the
27 requirements of subsection (2) or, for residential or mixed-use
28 residential development, the requirements of subsection (3), a
29 county must provide incentives to fully offset all costs to the
30 developer of its affordable housing contribution or linkage fee.
31 Such incentives may include, but are not limited to:
32 (a) Allowing the developer density or intensity bonus
33 incentives or more floor space than allowed under the current or
34 proposed future land use designation or zoning;
35 (b) Reducing or waiving fees, such as impact fees or water
36 and sewer charges; or
37 (c) Granting other incentives.
38
39 Any incentives provided under this subsection must be used for
40 the construction of affordable housing.
41 (7)(a) A county must authorize multifamily and mixed-use
42 residential as allowable uses in any area zoned for commercial,
43 industrial, or mixed use, and in portions of any flexibly zoned
44 area such as a planned unit development permitted for
45 commercial, industrial, or mixed use, if at least 40 percent of
46 the residential units in a proposed multifamily development are
47 rental units that, for a period of at least 50 30 years, are
48 affordable as defined in s. 420.0004. Notwithstanding any other
49 law, local ordinance, or regulation to the contrary, a county
50 may not require a proposed multifamily development to obtain a
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb675-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 675 2026
51 zoning or land use change, special exception, conditional use
52 approval, variance, transfer of density or development units,
53 amendment to a development of regional impact, or comprehensive
54 plan amendment for the building height, zoning, and densities
55 authorized under this subsection. For mixed-use residential
56 projects, at least 65 percent of the total square footage must
57 be used for residential purposes. The county may not require
58 that more than 10 percent of the total square footage of such
59 mixed-use residential projects be used for nonresidential
60 purposes.
61 Section 2. Subsection (4) and paragraph (a) of subsection
62 (7) of section 166.04151, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
63 166.04151 Affordable housing.—
64 (4) In exchange for a developer fulfilling the
65 requirements of subsection (2) or, for residential or mixed-use
66 residential development, the requirements of subsection (3), a
67 municipality must provide incentives to fully offset all costs
68 to the developer of its affordable housing contribution or
69 linkage fee. Such incentives may include, but are not limited
70 to:
71 (a) Allowing the developer density or intensity bonus
72 incentives or more floor space than allowed under the current or
73 proposed future land use designation or zoning;
74 (b) Reducing or waiving fees, such as impact fees or water
75 and sewer charges; or
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb675-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 675 2026
76 (c) Granting other incentives.
77
78 Any incentives provided under this subsection must be used for
79 the construction of affordable housing.
80 (7)(a) A municipality must authorize multifamily and
81 mixed-use residential as allowable uses in any area zoned for
82 commercial, industrial, or mixed use, and in portions of any
83 flexibly zoned area such as a planned unit development permitted
84 for commercial, industrial, or mixed use, if at least 40 percent
85 of the residential units in a proposed multifamily development
86 are rental units that, for a period of at least 50 30 years, are
87 affordable as defined in s. 420.0004. Notwithstanding any other
88 law, local ordinance, or regulation to the contrary, a
89 municipality may not require a proposed multifamily development
90 to obtain a zoning or land use change, special exception,
91 conditional use approval, variance, transfer of density or
92 development units, amendment to a development of regional
93 impact, amendment to a municipal charter, or comprehensive plan
94 amendment for the building height, zoning, and densities
95 authorized under this subsection. For mixed-use residential
96 projects, at least 65 percent of the total square footage must
97 be used for residential purposes. The municipality may not
98 require that more than 10 percent of the total square footage of
99 such mixed-use residential projects be used for nonresidential
100 purposes.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb675-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 675 2026
101 Section 3. Paragraphs (d) and (o) of subsection (3) of
102 section 196.1978, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
103 196.1978 Affordable housing property exemption.—
104 (3)
105 (d)1. The property appraiser shall exempt:
106 a. Seventy-five percent of the assessed value of the units
107 in multifamily projects that meet the requirements of this
108 subsection and are used to house natural persons or families
109 whose annual household income is greater than 80 percent but not
110 more than 100 120 percent of the median annual adjusted gross
111 income for households within the metropolitan statistical area
112 or, if not within a metropolitan statistical area, within the
113 county in which the person or family resides; and
114 b. From ad valorem property taxes the units in multifamily
115 projects that meet the requirements of this subsection and are
116 used to house natural persons or families whose annual household
117 income does not exceed 80 percent of the median annual adjusted
118 gross income for households within the metropolitan statistical
119 area or, if not within a metropolitan statistical area, within
120 the county in which the person or family resides.
121 2. When determining the value of a unit for purposes of
122 applying an exemption pursuant to this paragraph, the property
123 appraiser must include in such valuation the proportionate share
124 of the residential common areas, including the land, fairly
125 attributable to such unit.
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb675-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 675 2026
126 (o)1. Beginning with the 2025 tax roll, a taxing authority
127 may elect, upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution approved
128 by a two-thirds vote of the governing body, not to exempt
129 property under sub-subparagraph (d)1.a. located in a county
130 specified pursuant to subparagraph 2., subject to the conditions
131 of this paragraph.
132 2. A taxing authority must make a finding in the ordinance
133 or resolution that the most recently published Shimberg Center
134 for Housing Studies Annual Report, prepared pursuant to s.
135 420.6075, identifies that a county that is part of the
136 jurisdiction of the taxing authority is within a metropolitan
137 statistical area or region where the number of affordable and
138 available units in the metropolitan statistical area or region
139 is greater than the number of renter households in the
140 metropolitan statistical area or region for the category
141 entitled "0-100 120 percent AMI."
142 3. An election made pursuant to this paragraph may apply
143 only to the ad valorem property tax levies imposed within a
144 county specified pursuant to subparagraph 2. by the taxing
145 authority making the election.
146 4. The ordinance or resolution must take effect on the
147 January 1 immediately succeeding adoption and shall expire on
148 the second January 1 after the January 1 in which the ordinance
149 or resolution takes effect. The ordinance or resolution may be
150 renewed prior to its expiration pursuant to this paragraph.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb675-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 675 2026
151 5. The taxing authority proposing to make an election
152 under this paragraph must advertise the ordinance or resolution
153 or renewal thereof pursuant to the requirements of s. 50.011(1)
154 prior to adoption.
155 6. The taxing authority must provide to the property
156 appraiser the adopted ordinance or resolution or renewal thereof
157 by the effective date of the ordinance or resolution or renewal
158 thereof.
159 7. Notwithstanding an ordinance or resolution or renewal
160 thereof adopted pursuant to this paragraph, property in a
161 multifamily project that received an exemption pursuant to sub-
162 subparagraph (d)1.a. before the adoption or renewal of such
163 ordinance or resolution may continue to receive such exemption
164 for each subsequent consecutive year that the same owner or each
165 successive owner applies for and is granted the exemption.
166 Section 4. Subsections (9), (10), and (11) of section
167 201.02, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (10),
168 (11), and (12), respectively, and a new subsection (9) is added
169 to that section, to read:
170 201.02 Tax on deeds and other instruments relating to real
171 property or interests in real property.—
172 (9) Taxes imposed by this section do not apply to a deed,
173 transfer, or conveyance that transfers or conveys residential
174 property to a first-time homebuyer for use as a principal
175 residence. For purposes of this subsection, the term "first-time
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb675-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 675 2026
176 homebuyer" means an individual and, if married, such
177 individual's spouse, who has no present ownership interest in a
178 principal residence during the 3-year period ending on the date
179 of purchase of the principal residence and who is a moderate-
180 income person, low-income person, or very-low-income person as
181 defined in s. 420.602.
182 Section 5. Subsection (10) is added to section 201.08,
183 Florida Statutes, to read:
184 201.08 Tax on promissory or nonnegotiable notes, written
185 obligations to pay money, or assignments of wages or other
186 compensation; exception.—
187 (10) Taxes imposed by this section do not apply to
188 documents described in subsection (1) that are executed by a
189 first-time homebuyer in connection with the purchase of a
190 principal residence. For purposes of this subsection, the term
191 "first-time homebuyer" means an individual and, if married, such
192 individual's spouse, who has no present ownership interest in a
193 principal residence during the 3-year period ending on the date
194 of purchase of the principal residence and who is a moderate-
195 income person, low-income person, or very-low-income person as
196 defined in s. 420.602.
197 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb675-01-c1